Utah statutes.
9-3-507.   Notes, bonds, other obligation -- Not debt liability -- Expenses
payable from funds provided -- Agency without authority to incur liability on
behalf of state.
(1)  An obligation or liability of the authority does not constitute a debt or
liability of this state or of any of its political subdivisions nor does any
obligation or liability constitute the loaning of credit of the state or of
any of its political subdivisions nor may any obligation or liability of the
authority be payable from funds other than those of the authority.  All
obligations of the authority shall contain a statement to the effect that the
authority is obligated to pay them solely from the revenues or other funds of
the authority and that this state or its political subdivisions are not
obligated to pay them and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing
power of this state or any of its political subdivisions is pledged to the
payment of them.
(2)  All expenses incurred in carrying out this part shall be payable solely
from funds of the authority provided under this part, and nothing in this part
may be construed to authorize the authority to incur indebtedness or liability
on behalf of or payable by this state or any of its political subdivisions.
